Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 7 Money Transmitters
45-7-120. Termination or suspension of authorized agent activity.

The commissioner may issue an order suspending or barring the authorized agent from continuing to be or becoming an authorized agent of any licensee during the period for which the order is in effect, if, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that any authorized agent of a licensee or any director, officer, employee, or controlling person of the authorized agent has:

Violated any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation or order issued under this chapter;

Engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound act with respect to the business of selling or issuing payment instruments of the licensee or the business of money transmission; or

Made or caused to be made in any application or report filed with the commissioner or any proceeding before the commissioner, any statement that was at the time and in the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or has omitted to state in the application or report any material fact that is required to be stated in the application or report.

Upon issuance of the order, the licensee shall terminate its relationship with the authorized agent according to the terms of the order.

Any authorized agent to whom an order is issued under this section may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order. The commissioner shall not grant the application unless the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest to do so and that it is reasonable to believe that the person will, if and when the person is permitted to resume being an authorized agent of a licensee, comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter and any regulation or order issued under this title.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-220.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-121. Licensee liability.

A licensee's responsibility to any person who purchases a payment instrument or money transmission transaction from a licensee or a licensee's authorized agent shall be limited to the face amount of the payment instrument or money transmission transaction purchased.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-221.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-122. Hearings — Procedures.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, applies to any hearing afforded pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-222.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-123. Civil penalties.

If, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that a person has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter, the commissioner may order the person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in an amount specified by the commissioner, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation continues.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-223.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-124. Consent orders — Emergency orders.

The commissioner may enter into consent orders at any time with any person to resolve any matter arising under this chapter. A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or a duly authorized representative, and must indicate agreement to the terms contained therein. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued thereunder has been violated, nor need it constitute a finding by the commissioner that the person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued thereunder.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the commissioner may seek civil or criminal penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any enforcement action authorized by this chapter without providing the opportunity for a prior hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken, which is filed with the commissioner within twenty (20) days of the receipt of the notice of the commissioner's emergency action.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-224

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-125. Criminal penalties — Reports.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this chapter or any order or rule pursuant thereto for which a penalty is not specifically provided commits a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that each day the violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a material, false statement in any document filed or required to be filed under this chapter with the intent to deceive the recipient of the document commits a Class E felony.

Any person who knowingly and willfully fails to file a document required to be filed under this chapter commits a Class E felony.

Any person who carries on an unauthorized money transmitter business commits a Class E felony.

Any person who obstructs or endeavors to obstruct a lawful examination of a licensee or agent commits a Class E felony.

It is the duty of the commissioner to submit to the district attorneys general for the respective counties of the state any criminal violation of this chapter known by the commissioner to have occurred in the county. The commissioner shall also report the violation to the appropriate division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The commissioner may provide the information to the attorney general and reporter or the appropriate federal authorities, or both, as the commissioner deems proper. Confidential information that is communicated by the commissioner pursuant to this section remains confidential in the hands of the agency to which the information is reported, and does not become a matter of public record by virtue of this communication.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-225.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalties for Class E felony and Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-7-126. Promulgation of rules.

All rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to authority conferred by this chapter or this title will be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In addition, at the time the commissioner files a notice of proposed adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule for public comment, a copy of the notice shall be sent by regular United States mail, postage prepaid, to all then current licensees under this chapter.

Acts 1994, ch. 715, § 1; T.C.A., §45-7-226.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-127. Requirement of licensing through a multi-state automated licensing system.

In addition to any other powers imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner is authorized to require persons subject to this chapter to be licensed through a multi-state automated licensing system. Pursuant to this authority, the commissioner may:

Promulgate whatever rules and regulations are reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish relationships or enter into agreements that are reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system. The agreements may include, but are not limited to, operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and technology licensing agreements;

Require that applications for licensing under this chapter and renewals of such licenses be filed with a multi-state automated licensing system;

Require that any fees required to be paid under this chapter be paid through a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish deadlines for transitioning licensees to a multi-state automated licensing system. The commissioner has the authority to deny any applications or renewal applications not filed with a multi-state automated licensing system after such deadlines have passed, notwithstanding any dates established elsewhere in this chapter. The commissioner shall, however, provide reasonable notice of any transition deadlines to licensees; and

Take such further actions as are reasonably necessary to give effect to this section.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the commissioner to require a person who is not subject to this chapter to submit information to, or to participate in, a multi-state automated licensing system that is operated or participated in pursuant to this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner retains full authority and discretion to license persons under this chapter and to enforce this chapter to its fullest extent. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to be a reduction or derogation of that authority and discretion.

Applicants for, and holders of, licenses issued under this chapter shall pay all costs associated with submitting an application to or transitioning a license to a multi-state automated licensing system, as well as all costs required by a multi-state automated licensing system for maintaining and renewing any license issued by the commissioner on a multi-state automated licensing system.

Acts 2013, ch. 103, § 2; T.C.A., §45-7-227.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-128. Use of multi-state automated licensing system as agent for channeling information.

The commissioner is authorized to use a multi-state automated licensing system as an agent for channeling information, whether criminal or noncriminal in nature, whether derived from or distributed to the United States department of justice or any other state or federal governmental agency, or any other source, that the commissioner is authorized to request or distribute under this chapter.

Acts 2013, ch. 103, § 3; T.C.A., §45-7-228.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-7-129. More effective regulation and reduction of regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

The requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to a multi-state automated licensing system, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to a multi-state automated licensing system. The information or material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with money transmission oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law, including the protection available under §§ 45-1-120 and 45-7-116;

For purposes of subdivision (1), the commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements or sharing agreements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors or other associations representing governmental agencies as established by rule, regulation or order of the commissioner;

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidential under subdivision (1) shall not be subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or any agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by a multi-state automated licensing system applicable to such information or material, the person to whom such information or material pertains waives that privilege, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person;

This section shall supersede any inconsistent provisions of title 10, chapter 7, part 5, pertaining to the records open to public inspection;

This section shall not apply with respect to information or material relating to publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against persons subject to this chapter that is included in a multi-state automated licensing system for access by the public.

Acts 2013, ch. 103, § 4; T.C.A., §45-7-229.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 2 of chapter 7, §§45-7-201 to45-7-229, was renumbered as chapter 7, §§45-7-101 to45-7-129, by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

45-7-130. Submission of multi-state automated licensing system reports of condition.

Each licensee shall, pursuant to an order or direction of the commissioner, submit to a multi-state automated licensing system reports of condition in the form and containing the information the commissioner requires.

Acts 2020, ch. 730, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 730, § 6. June 22, 2020.